Missouri, session 2026, SB895.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 324.004, to read as
follows:
324.004. 1. Any person who has at least three years
of work experience in an occupation or profession in another
state, the District of Columbia, or any combination of such
jurisdictions, and whose work experience involved the
practice of an occupation or profession for which a license
is not required in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in
which the person worked but is required in this state, may
submit an application for a one-time nonrenewable two-year
temporary license in this state in the occupation or
profession, along with proof of at least three years of work
experience in the occupation or profession and a fee as set
by regulation of the oversight body, to the relevant
oversight body in this state. The oversight body shall make
a determination of qualification within forty-five days of
receiving a completed application.
2. The oversight body shall require an applicant under
this section to take and pass the examination specific to
the occupation or profession which is required for licensure
by those individuals applying pursuant to the provisions of
the oversight body's statutory and regulatory authority. An
oversight body that administers an examination on the laws
of this state as part of its licensing application


requirements may require an applicant under this section to
take and pass an examination specific to the laws of this
state.
3. The oversight body shall not issue a one-time
nonrenewable temporary license to any applicant described in
subsection 1 of this section who has had any license in the
relevant occupation or profession revoked by an oversight
body outside of this state, who is currently under
investigation, who has a complaint pending, or who is
currently under disciplinary action.
4. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, applicants for the one-time temporary
nonrenewable license under this section shall be citizens of
the United States or lawfully present noncitizens authorized
to work in the United States under federal law and shall
submit legal proof of citizenship or employment
authorization that is acceptable for the employment
eligibility verification under federal law as part of the
application. If the holder of a one-time nonrenewable
temporary license issued under this section loses lawful
presence or federal work authorization, the one-time
nonrenewable temporary license shall automatically be
revoked.
(2) Applicants for the one-time nonrenewable
temporary license under this section in an occupation
regulated by the board of therapeutic massage shall be
citizens of the United States and shall submit legal proof
of citizenship as part of the application.
5. If an applicant is not currently residing in this
state, the oversight body shall conditionally approve the
application contingent upon receipt of proof of domicile in
this state within ninety days of the applicant receiving the
temporary license. If the applicant fails to provide proof


within ninety days of receiving the temporary license, the
oversight body may terminate the temporary license and the
applicant may reapply for a temporary license.
6. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
the following:
(1) Any occupation whose oversight body has entered
into a licensing compact with another state for the
regulation of practice under the oversight body's
jurisdiction. The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to alter the authority granted by, or any
requirements promulgated pursuant to, any
interjurisdictional or interstate compacts adopted by this
state or any reciprocity agreements with other states, and
whenever possible the provisions of this section shall be
interpreted so as to imply no conflict between it and any
compact or any reciprocity agreement with other states;
(2) Any occupation set forth in subsection 6 of
section 290.257 or any electrical contractor licensed under
sections 324.900 to 324.945;
(3) Any occupation whose regulators or licensees are
required to comply with specific federal statutory,
regulatory, and administrative requirements in order to
practice in this state; or
(4) Assistant physicians licensed under chapter 334.
7. The one-time nonrenewable temporary license shall
expire after two years. Upon expiration, the individual
shall be required to apply for a permanent license in
accordance with the license requirements for the occupation
for which he or she held the temporary license.
8. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, a license issued under this section shall be valid
only in this state and shall not make a licensee eligible to
be part of an interstate compact. An applicant who is


licensed in another state pursuant to an interstate compact
shall not be eligible for licensure by an oversight body
under the provisions of this section.
9. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, a license issued under this section shall be valid
only in this state and shall not make a licensee eligible to
obtain a license by reciprocity in another state.
10. As used in this section, the term "oversight body"
means any board, department, agency, or office of a
jurisdiction that issues occupational or professional
licenses.
100 11. The division of professional registration may
101 promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
102 section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
103 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
104 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
105 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
106 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
107 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
108 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
109 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
110 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
111 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
112 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
113 2026, shall be invalid and void.